North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-64 Mill Levy Reduction Allocations and Grants [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 137, § 38]

57-64-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 535, § 6; 2011, ch. 457, § 8; 2013, ch. 13, § 63; repealed by 2015, sb2031, § 38, effective July 1, 2015.

57-64-02.
Mill levy reduction allocation and grant. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 535, § 6; 2011, ch. 457, § 9; 2013, ch. 13, § 63; 2013, ch. 63, § 13; repealed by 2015, sb2031, § 38, effective July 1, 2015.

57-64-03.
School district levy compliance. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 535, § 6; 2011, ch. 457, § 10; 2013, ch. 13, § 63; repealed by 2015, sb2031, § 38, effective July 1, 2015.

57-64-04.
Levy reduction priority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 535, § 6; 2011, ch. 457, § 11; 2013, ch. 13, § 63; repealed by 2015, sb2031, § 38, effective July 1, 2015.

57-64-05.
Property tax relief fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 535, § 7; 2013, ch. 13, § 40; 2013, ch. 13, § 63; repealed by 2015, ch. 467, § 7, effective April 27, 2015; repealed by 2015, sb2031, § 38, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 7 of chapter 467, S.L. 2015 became effective April 27, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 9 of chapter 467, S.L. 2015.